Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 10.4 Driver Privilege Cards and Permits [Effective July 1, 2023.]

31-10.4-1.
Driver privilege cards and permits. [Effective July 1, 2023.]

Upon application of any person, who otherwise meets the requirements of chapter 10 of this title, except is unable to establish legal presence in the United States, the division of motor vehicles is authorized to issue a driver privilege card and/or driver privilege permit, to any applicant, if the division of motor vehicles determines that the applicant:

Has verification from the tax administrator that the applicant either has filed a personal income tax return as a resident with this state for the tax year preceding the date of application or has been claimed as a dependent on a personal income tax return by an individual who has filed a personal income tax return as a resident with this state for the tax year preceding the date of application;

Presents two (2) primary proof of identity documents, as defined in §

31-10.4-5

, or one primary proof of identity document and one secondary proof of identity document, as defined in §

31-10.4-5

;

Presents two (2) proof of residency documents, which shall mean, for purposes of this subsection, the proof of residency documents set forth in

280-RICR-30-00-1

.4.1(D), as may be amended from time to time; and

Is not in violation of the insurance requirements, set forth in chapters 31 and 32 of this title.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles may provide information submitted by the applicant to the tax administrator for the sole purpose of implementing subsection (a)(1) of this section, and such information shall be kept confidential by the tax administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 241, § 1, effective July 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 242, § 1, effective July 1, 2023.

31-10.4-2.
Issuance of driver privilege cards and permits. [Effective July 1, 2023.]

Driver privilege cards and permits shall confer the same privileges and shall be subject to the same provisions of this title as driver’s licenses and permits issued under chapter 10 of this title, unless otherwise provided, and shall be subject to the following conditions and exceptions:

The front and back of a driver privilege card or permit shall be identical in appearance to a driver’s license or permit, that is not a REAL ID credential;

An applicant for a driver privilege card or permit shall not be required to present proof of legal presence in the United States or proof of a social security number, if the individual does not have one;

A driver privilege card or permit shall expire on the applicant’s second birthday following the date of its issuance;

The fee for an original driver privilege card shall be fifty dollars ($50.00). Every driver privilege card renewal issued after expiration of the original driver privilege card shall expire on the birthday of the cardholder in the fifth year following the issuance of the driver privilege card, with the exception of any person seventy-five (75) years or older whose driver privilege card shall expire on the birthday of the cardholder in the second year following the issuance of the driver privilege card, and shall be renewable on or before expiration upon application and payment of a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00). No applicant shall be required to provide proof of compliance with §

31-10.4-1(a)(1)

through (3) for a reissued, renewed, or duplicate card or permit; and

Any information collected pursuant to this section, that is not otherwise collected by the division of motor vehicles or required for the issuance of any other driving credential issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and any information regarding restrictions in the division of motor vehicles’ records, related to the issuance of a credential issued pursuant to this section, shall not be considered a public record. The information shall not be released, except upon request by the subject of the information, the parent of a minor who is the subject of the information, the guardian of the subject of the information, or the authorized representative of the subject of the information, or pursuant to a court order.

Applicants for a driver privilege card will not be required to comply with successful completion of the written exam required by §

31-10-21

and the road test required by §

31-10-22

if they can provide one of the following:

A current valid driver’s license, or one that has expired by less than five (5) years, issued by a state or U.S. territory, whose driving records are accessible through the Problem Driver Pointer System maintained by the National Driver Register; or

In the event the driver’s license issued by another state or U.S. territory is not available at the time the application is made, or the driving records of the issuing state or territory are not accessible through the Problem Driver Pointer System maintained by the National Driver Register, a certified driving record issued less than thirty (30) days prior to application will be accepted.

Applicants under the age of eighteen (18) shall be required to comply with all of the education and testing requirements, set forth in §§

31-10-19

through

31-10-22

, and all of the provisions of the graduated licenses statutes, set forth in §§

31-10-6

through

31-10-6.5

.

Applicants eighteen (18) years of age and older, who do not meet the driving experience requirement in this chapter, shall be required to comply with all testing requirements set forth in §§

31-10-21

through

31-10-22

.

Unless they are in conflict with the provisions of this chapter or the context in which they are used clearly requires a different meaning or a different definition as prescribed for a particular section, group of sections, or provision, for purposes of this title, chapter 11.1 of title 15, chapter 12 of title 24, and chapter 18.1 of title 39, the terms “license” and “operator’s license” shall include the “driver privilege card”, and “permit” shall include “driver privilege permit” as defined by this section, and all examinations, education requirements, residency requirements, penalties, fees, and all other provisions for a license, operator’s license, or permit shall also apply to the driver privilege card and driver privilege permit.

The driver privilege card and the driver privilege permit shall not be a valid form of identification for official federal purposes or state voting purposes.

The applicant for a driver privilege card or the driver privilege permit shall be required to comply with all other applicable Rhode Island laws, rules, and regulations.

A driver privilege card or a driver privilege permit shall not be used as evidence of the holder’s citizenship or immigration status, and shall not be used as a basis for a criminal investigation, arrest, or detention in circumstances where a person with a regular driver’s license would not be criminally investigated, arrested, or detained. Any person aggrieved by a violation of this subsection may seek appropriate declaratory and/or injunctive relief and may be awarded damages and costs, including attorneys’ fees.

It shall be a violation of chapter 112 of title 42 to discriminate against an individual solely on the ground that they hold or present a driver privilege card or driver privilege permit, issued under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 241, § 1, effective July 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 242, § 1, effective July 1, 2023.

31-10.4-3.
Confidentiality of documents — Privacy. [Effective July 1, 2023.]

The division of motor vehicles shall not release the following information, relating to the issuance of a driver privilege card or permit, except upon request by the subject of the information, the parent of a minor who is the subject of the information, the guardian of the subject of the information, or the authorized representative of the subject of the information, or pursuant to a court order:

Proof documents submitted for the purpose of obtaining a driver privilege card or permit;

The information in the division of motor vehicles’ records indicating the type of proof documentation that was provided; or

Applications.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any document, including photo images, provided by the applicant to the division of motor vehicles for purposes of proving the applicant’s eligibility for a non-commercial driver’s license or permit or for renewal of such license or permit under this section is not a public record and may not be disclosed by the division, except to the person who is the subject of such records or in response to a subpoena for individual records in a criminal proceeding or pursuant to a lawful court order.

The division, and any agent or employee of the division, shall not disclose or make accessible in any manner, records or information that he or she obtains or maintains under this section, including photo images, to any federal, state, or municipal agency or to any employee or agent of such agency for the purpose of enforcing immigration law, unless the division is presented with a lawful court order or judicial warrant signed by a judge, appointed pursuant to article III of the United States Constitution.

Upon receiving a request for such records or information, the division shall, no later than three (3) days after such request, notify the individual, about whom such information was requested, informing the individual of the request and the identity of the agency that made the request.

The division shall require any agency or entity that receives or has access to records or information from the division, including photo images, to certify, before such receipt or access, that such person or entity shall not:

Use such records or information for immigration enforcement purposes; or

Disclose such records or information to any other agency or entity, or to any employee or agent of any such agency or entity, unless that other agency or entity also certifies that the information will not be used for purposes of enforcing immigration law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 241, § 1, effective July 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 242, § 1, effective July 1, 2023.

31-10.4-4.
Rules and regulations. [Effective July 1, 2023.]

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 241, § 1, effective July 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 242, § 1, effective July 1, 2023.

31-10.4-5.
Definitions. [Effective July 1, 2023.]

For purposes of this chapter:

“Primary proof of identity document” means any of the following documents that bear the applicant’s legal name and date of birth:

A valid foreign passport issued by an applicant’s country of citizenship that is unexpired or expired for less than five (5) years;

A valid, unexpired consular identification document issued by an applicant’s country of citizenship;

An employment authorization document;

A refugee travel document (I-571);

A valid driver’s license issued by a state of the United States with the applicant’s photograph, signature, and date of birth that is unexpired or expired for less than five (5) years; or

Any other document sufficient to prove the applicant’s identity as determined by the division of motor vehicles.

“Secondary proof of identity document” means any of the following documents that bear the applicant’s legal name:

A valid driver privilege card or state identification card issued by a state or territory of the United States that is unexpired or expired for less than five (5) years;

An original or certified copy of a foreign birth certificate;

A foreign driver’s license;

A valid foreign national identification card;

A marriage certificate issued by a state or territory of the United States;

A divorce decree issued by a state or territory of the United States;

A court order for adoption, name change or gender change issued by a court of the United States or a court of a state of the United States that contains a court seal;

A U.S. permit to Reenter Travel Document (I-327);

A USCIS form I-797;

A certified copy of school records or a school transcript issued by a school accredited by a state, jurisdiction, or territory of the United States;

A U.S. Merchant Mariners Card;

A U.S. Selective Service Card;

A U.S. Military DD214 or DD256;

A Veteran Administration Identification card with photograph;

A Transportation Workers Identification Credential;

A U.S. Active Duty/Retiree/Reservist/Dependent Military ID card (DD-2 or Common Access card);

A U.S. Customs and Border Protection FAST card;

An individual taxpayer identification number assignment letter; or

Any other document sufficient to prove the applicant’s identity as determined by the division of motor vehicles.

Any primary proof of identity document or secondary proof of identity document that is in a language other than English shall be accompanied by a certified English translation of such document. Proof of change to the name contained on the applicant’s primary proof of identity document or secondary proof of identity document must be demonstrated with a document issued by an authorized government agency.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 241, § 1, effective July 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 242, § 1, effective July 1, 2023.